Utah statutes.
9-1-811.   Rulemaking.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the Department of Heritage and Arts may make rules to:

(1)  implement this part; and

(2)  ensure the commission complies with the act and related federal requirements.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 38, 2013 General Session

